Washington statutes.
RCW 1.70.030

Legal material in official electronic record.

(1) If an official publisher publishes legal material only in an electronic record, the publisher shall:

(a) Designate the electronic record as official; and

(b) Comply with RCW 1.70.040, 1.70.060, and 1.70.070.

(2) An official publisher that publishes legal material in an electronic record and also publishes the material in a record other than an electronic record may designate the electronic record as official if the publisher complies with RCW 1.70.040, 1.70.060, and 1.70.070.

[ 2017 c 106 s 4.]